Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5092.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 22a. (1) Subject to section 22b, a person that meets all of the following requirements may apply to the department for a breeding license to breed large carnivores: (a) Is conducting a for-profit or nonprofit business, if the primary purpose of that business is the presentation of animals including large carnivores to the public for education or exhibition purposes. (b) Is a class C licensee that possesses and maintains a class C license under 9 CFR parts 1 and 2. (c) Meets or exceeds all standards required of a class C licensee under 9 CFR parts 1 and 2 and maintains the class C license in good standing for the previous 5 years. (d) Does not allow a patron to come into direct contact with a large carnivore. (e) Does not sell large carnivores, except to another person that meets the requirements of this section. (2) As used in this section, good standing means a person has not had a federal or state license suspended or revoked, or has not been made subject to a cease and desist order. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor